District of Columbia statutes.
4-251.07

Construction.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as relieving the parent of a child from any child support order regarding the child for whom a grandparent or relative caregiver is receiving a subsidy under this chapter.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create a new cause of action or to limit the rights or remedies available to parents in custody or guardianship actions.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-69, § 107, 53 DCR 54
Dec. 15, 2015, D.C. Law 21-40, § 2(e), 62 DCR 13746

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-40 substituted “grandparent or relative caregiver” for “grandparent” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 107 of Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-278, February 22, 2006, 53 DCR 1459).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-200, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15270).